Utah statutes.
17-41-501.   Vested mining use -- Conclusive presumption.

(1) (a)  A mining use is conclusively presumed to be a vested mining use if the mining use existed or was conducted or otherwise engaged in before a political subdivision prohibits, restricts, or otherwise limits the mining use.

(b)  Anyone claiming that a vested mining use has not been established has the burden of proof to show by clear and convincing evidence that the vested mining use has not been established.

(2)  A vested mining use:

(a)  runs with the land; and

(b)  may be changed to another mining use without losing its status as a vested mining use.

(3)  The present or future boundary described in the large mine permit of a mine operator with a vested mining use does not limit:

(a)  the scope of the mine operator's rights under this chapter; or

(b)  the protection that this chapter provides for a mining protection area.

(4) (a)  A mine operator with a vested mining use shall file a declaration for recording in the office of the recorder of the county in which the vested mining use is located.

(b)  A declaration under Subsection (4)(a) shall:

(i)  contain a legal description of the land included within the vested mining use; and

(ii)  provide notice of the vested mining use.

